Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 62
INSPECTION OF OIL WELLS

34-62-101 to 34-62-110. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 85:

Entire article repealed, p. 1129, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 7 of chapter 100, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1985, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.